Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3002
Legal Aid and Services Fund; created; use; investment.

The Legal Aid and Services Fund is created. Money in the fund shall be used to provide civil legal services to eligible low-income persons. The Commission on Public Advocacy shall distribute all money in the fund periodically in the form of grants to service providers of civil legal services to eligible low-income persons as determined by the commission pursuant to section 25-3004. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any money left in the Legal Aid and Services Fund on December 31 of any year shall be distributed in the following year.

Laws 1997, LB 729, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 759, § 1.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.